apertium-tg-fa.fa.metadix
    <pardef n="P__prefixes">
      <e>
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>می‌</l>
          <r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>ﺏ‌</l>
          <r>ﺏ<s n="bi"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>می</l>
          <r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>می<b/></l>
          <r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <par n="P__ن"/>
        <p>
          <l>ﺏ</l>
          <r>ﺏ<s n="bi"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>من</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>تو</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>او</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- him or her -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>وی</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ما</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>شما</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>شماها</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آن‌ها</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>آنها</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>آنان</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- human only -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ایشان</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>خودم</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>خودت</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>خودش</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خودمان</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خودتان</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خودشان</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="همه__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>همه</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="خود__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خود</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="خویش__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خویش</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="خویشتن__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>خویشتن</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="واین__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>واین</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="وان__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وان</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="آنجا__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آنجا</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="انجا__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>انجا</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="اینجا__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اینجا</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="اینجانب__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اینجانب</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="آنچه__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آنچه</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="برخی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>برخی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بعضی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>بعضی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="فلان__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>فلان</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="فلانی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>فلانی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>کی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="یکدیگر__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یکدیگر</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کس__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>کس</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کسى__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>کسى</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="یکى__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یکى</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هریک__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هریک</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هرکدام__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هرکدام</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هرکس__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هرکس</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هرکسی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هرکسی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هرکه__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هرکه</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هم__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هم</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="همدیگر__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>همدیگر</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="personal subject pronouns"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
